Hawaii, session 2026, HB1311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 514B-123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  If [a] the proxy form is a standard proxy form authorized by the association, the proxy form shall comply with the following additional requirements: (1)  The proxy form shall contain boxes wherein the owner may indicate that the proxy is given: (A)  For quorum purposes only; or (B)  To the individual whose name is printed on a line next to [this] the box; [(C)  To the board as a whole and that the vote is to be made on the basis of the preference of the majority of the directors present at the meeting; or (D)  To those directors present at the meeting with the vote to be shared with each director receiving an equal percentage;] provided that if the proxy form is returned with no box or [more than one] both of the boxes in subparagraphs (A) [through (D)] and (B) checked, the proxy shall be counted for quorum purposes only; and (2)  The proxy form shall also contain a box wherein the owner may indicate that the owner wishes to obtain a copy of the annual audit report required by section 514B‑150." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________